Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1611.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be


codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:


This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Procurement


Protection Act of 2026”.


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 85.59 of Title 74, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


As used in this act:


1. “Company” means any sole proprietorship, organization,


association, corporation, partnership, joint venture, limited

Req. No. 3225 Page 1


partnership, limited liability partnership, limited liability


company, or other entity or business association, including all


wholly owned subsidiaries, majority-owned subsidiaries, parent


companies, or affiliates of such entities or business associations


that exist for the purpose of making profit;


2. “Control” means:


a. control as defined in the Investment Company Act of


1940, 15 U.S.C., Section 80a-2(a), or


b in the case of a company domiciled in the People’s


Republic of China, involvement in a company’s


governance structure, monitoring, or internal human


resources decisions of a company consistent with the


objectives set out in the Opinion on Strengthening the


United Front Work of the Private Economy in the New


Era issued by the General Office of the Central


Committee of the Chinese Communist Party (2020) or a


successor or similar document;


3. “Domicile” means the country in which a company is


registered, the company’s affairs are primarily completed, and where


the majority of ownership share is held;


4. “Federally banned corporation” means any company or


designated equipment federally banned currently or banned after the


effective date of this act. Such bans shall include those resulting


from, but not limited to, the following federal agencies and acts:

Req. No. 3225 Page 2


a. the Federal Communications Commission, including, but


not limited to, any equipment or service deemed to


pose a threat to national security identified on the


Covered List developed pursuant to 47 C.F.R., Section


1.50002 and published by the Public Safety and


Homeland Security Bureau of the Federal Communications


Commission pursuant to the federal Secure and Trusted


Communications Networks Act of 2019, 47 U.S.C.,


Section 1601 et seq.,


b. the United States Department of Commerce,


c. the Cybersecurity and Infrastructure Security Agency,


d. the Federal Acquisition Security Council, and


e. Section 889 of the John S. McCain National Defense


Authorization Act for Fiscal Year 2019, P. L. 115-232;


5. “Foreign adversary” means a government other than the


federal government of the United States or the government of any


state, political subdivision of the state, tribe, territory, or


possession of the United States and designated by the United States


Secretary of State as hostile or a Country of Particular Concern


(CPC); and


6. “Foreign adversary company” means any company, other than a


United States person or United States subsidiary as such terms are


defined in 15 C.F.R., Section 772.1, that:



Req. No. 3225 Page 3


a. is domiciled, incorporated, issued, or listed in a


foreign adversary country,


b. is headquartered in a foreign adversary country,


c. has its principal place of business in a foreign


adversary country,


d. is controlled by the government of a foreign adversary


or any instrumentality thereof, or


e. is majority-owned by an entity controlled by the


government of a foreign adversary or any


instrumentality thereof.


If a parent company does not meet any of the criteria set forth


in this paragraph and does not recognize more than fifty percent


(50%) of the total annual global revenue of the parent company and


subsidiaries from a foreign adversary, such parent company shall not


be considered a foreign adversary company.


SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 85.59a of Title 74, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. Except as provided under subsection D of this section, the


following companies shall be ineligible to bid on or submit a


proposal for a contract with a state agency or political subdivision


of this state for goods or services:


1. A state-owned enterprise of a foreign adversary;


2. A company domiciled within a foreign adversary;

Req. No. 3225 Page 4


3. A foreign adversary company; or


4. A federally banned corporation.


B. A state agency or any political subdivision of this state


shall require a company that submits a bid or proposal with respect


to a contract for goods or services to certify that the company is


not a company listed under subsection A of this section.


C. If the Director of the Office of Management and Enterprise


Services or political subdivision determines that a company has


submitted a false certification under subsection B of this section:


1. The company shall be liable for a civil penalty in an amount


that is equal to Two Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars ($250,000.00) or


twice the amount of the contract for which a bid or proposal was


submitted, whichever is greater;


2. The state agency or the Office of Management and Enterprise


Services shall terminate the contract with the company; and


3. The company shall be ineligible to, and shall not, bid on a


state contract for sixty (60) months.


D. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection B of this


section, a state agency may enter into a contract for goods


manufactured by a company listed under subsection A of this section


if:


1. There is no other reasonable option for procuring the good;


and



Req. No. 3225 Page 5


2. The contract is pre-approved by the Director of the Office


of Management and Enterprise Services, or, in the case of a


political subdivision, the contract is pre-approved by the


procurement authority of the political subdivision, after a


determination that not procuring the good would pose a greater


threat to this state than the threat associated with the


procurement.


SECTION 4. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-3225 MSBB 1/13/2026 1:24:45 PM





























Req. No. 3225 Page 6